Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.335.270

School property used for public purposes—Special state commission to pass on plans.

Plans of any second-class district or combination of districts for the carrying out of the powers granted by RCW 28A.335.250 through 28A.335.280 shall be submitted to and approved by a board of supervisors composed of members, as follows: The superintendent of public instruction; the head of the extension department of Washington State University; the head of the extension department of the University of Washington; and the educational service district superintendent; these to choose one member from such county in which the facilities are proposed to be located, and two members, from the district or districts concerned.

[ 1990 c 33 s 364; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 15 s 12. Prior: 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 121; 1975 c 43 s 18; 1973 1st ex.s. c 154 s 46; 1971 c 48 s 37; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.60.210; prior: 1913 c 129 s 3; RRS s 4839. Formerly RCW 28A.60.210, 28.63.210.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—1975 c 43: See notes following RCW 28A.535.050.

Severability—1973 1st ex.s. c 154: See note following RCW 2.12.030.

Severability—1971 c 48: See note following RCW 28A.310.250.